Utah statutes.
67-20-8.   Volunteer experience credit.

(1)  State agencies shall designate positions for which approved volunteer experience satisfies the job requirements for purposes of employment.

(2)  When evaluating applicants for those designated positions, state agencies shall consider documented approved volunteer experience in the same manner as similar paid employment.

(3)  The Department of Human Resource Management shall make statewide rules governing the:

(a)  designation of volunteer positions; and

(b)  a uniform process to document the approval, use, and hours worked by volunteers.

